extras/dictionaries/la.aff
SFX E eo      issetisve       eo        
SFX E eo      issent          eo        
SFX E eo      issentque       eo        
SFX E eo      issentne        eo        
SFX E eo      issentve        eo        
SFX E eo      eundus          eo        
SFX E eo      eundusque       eo        
SFX E eo      eundusne        eo        
SFX E eo      eundusve        eo        
SFX E eo      eundi           eo        
SFX E eo      eundique        eo        
SFX E eo      eundine         eo        
SFX E eo      eundive         eo        
SFX E eo      eundo           eo        
SFX E eo      eundoque        eo        
SFX E eo      eundone         eo        
SFX E eo      eundove         eo        
SFX E eo      eundum          eo        
SFX E eo      eundumque       eo        
SFX E eo      eundumne        eo        
SFX E eo      eundumve        eo        
SFX E eo      eunde           eo        
SFX E eo      eundeque        eo        
SFX E eo      eundene         eo        
SFX E eo      eundeve         eo        
SFX E eo      eunda           eo        
SFX E eo      eundaque        eo        
SFX E eo      eundane         eo        
SFX E eo      eundave         eo        
SFX E eo      eundae          eo        
SFX E eo      eundaeque       eo        
SFX E eo      eundaene        eo        
SFX E eo      eundaeve        eo        
SFX E eo      eundarum        eo        
SFX E eo      eundarumque     eo        
SFX E eo      eundarumne      eo        
SFX E eo      eundarumve      eo        
SFX E eo      eundorum        eo        
SFX E eo      eundorumque     eo        
SFX E eo      eundorumne      eo        
SFX E eo      eundorumve      eo        
SFX E eo      eundis          eo        
SFX E eo      eundisque       eo        
SFX E eo      eundisne        eo        
SFX E eo      eundisve        eo        
SFX E eo      eundos          eo        
SFX E eo      eundosque       eo        
SFX E eo      eundosne        eo        
SFX E eo      eundosve        eo        
SFX E eo      eundas          eo        
SFX E eo      eundasque       eo        
SFX E eo      eundasne        eo        
SFX E eo      eundasve        eo        
SFX E eo      iens            eo        
SFX E eo      iensque         eo        
SFX E eo      iensne          eo        
SFX E eo      iensve          eo        
SFX E eo      euntis          eo        
SFX E eo      euntisque       eo        
SFX E eo      euntisne        eo        
SFX E eo      euntisve        eo        
SFX E eo      eunti           eo        
SFX E eo      euntique        eo        
SFX E eo      euntine         eo        
SFX E eo      euntive         eo        
SFX E eo      euntem          eo        
SFX E eo      euntemque       eo        
SFX E eo      euntemne        eo        
SFX E eo      euntemve        eo        
SFX E eo      eunte           eo        
SFX E eo      eunteque        eo        
SFX E eo      euntene         eo        
SFX E eo      eunteve         eo        
SFX E eo      euntes          eo        
SFX E eo      euntesque       eo        
SFX E eo      euntesne        eo        
SFX E eo      euntesve        eo        
SFX E eo      euntium         eo        
SFX E eo      euntiumque      eo        
SFX E eo      euntiumne       eo        
SFX E eo      euntiumve       eo        
SFX E eo      euntibus        eo        
SFX E eo      euntibusque     eo        
SFX E eo      euntibusne      eo        
SFX E eo      euntibusve      eo        
SFX E eo      euntia          eo        
SFX E eo      euntiaque       eo        
SFX E eo      euntiane        eo        
SFX E eo      euntiave        eo        
SFX E eo      isti            eo        
SFX E eo      istique         eo        
SFX E eo      istine          eo        
SFX E eo      istive          eo        
SFX E eo      istis           eo        
SFX E eo      istisque        eo        
SFX E eo      istisne         eo        
SFX E eo      istisve         eo        
SFX E eo      issem           eo        
SFX E eo      issemque        eo        
SFX E eo      issemne         eo        
SFX E eo      issemve         eo        
SFX E eo      isses           eo        
SFX E eo      issesque        eo        
SFX E eo      issesne         eo        
SFX E eo      issesve         eo        
SFX E eo      isset           eo        
SFX E eo      issetque        eo        
SFX E eo      issetne         eo        
SFX E eo      issetve         eo        
SFX E eo      issemus         eo        
SFX E eo      issemusque      eo        
SFX E eo      issemusne       eo        
SFX E eo      issemusve       eo        
SFX E eo      issetis         eo        
SFX E eo      issetisque      eo        
SFX E eo      issetisne       eo        
SFX E eo      issetisve       eo        
SFX E eo      issent          eo        
SFX E eo      issentque       eo        
SFX E eo      issentne        eo        
SFX E eo      issentve        eo        
