extras/dictionaries/la.dic
abeo/E
adeo/E
anteeo/E
anteo/E
circueo/E
circumeo/E
coeo/E
compereo/E
conpereo/E
contraeo/E
depereo/E
dispereo/E
exeo/E
ineo/E
intereo/E
introeo/E
nequeo/E
obeo/E
pereo/E
perexeo/E
pertranseo/E
posteo/E
praeeo/E
praetereo/E
prodeo/E
queo/E
redeo/E
retranseo/E
retroeo/E
reveneo/E
subeo/E
subintroeo/E
supereo/E
superexeo/E
transabeo/E
transeo/E
veneo/E
